sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Meracie nástroje a snímače > Merače vibrácií: Pevné merače vibrácií; Ručné merače vibrácií
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Outils de mesure et détecteurs > Vibromètres: Vibromètres fixes; Vibromètres portatifs
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Měřicí nástroje a přístroje > Měřiče vibrací: Pevné měřiče vibrací; Ruční měřiče vibrací
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Mittarit ja anturit > Tärinämittarit: Kiinteät tärinämittarit; Käsikäyttöiset tärinämittarit
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Merilna orodja in senzorji > Merilniki vibracij: Fiksni merilniki vibracij; Ročni merilniki vibracij
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Matavimo įrankiai ir jutikliai > Vibracijos matuokliai: Fiksuoti vibracijos matuokliai; Rankiniai vibracijos matuokliai
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Измервателни инструменти и сензори > Измерватели на вибрации: Фиксирани измерватели на вибрации; Ръчни измерватели на вибрации
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Ölçüm Aletleri ve Sensörler > Titreşim Ölçerler: Sabit Titreşim Ölçerler; El Tipi Titreşim Ölçerler
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Strumenti/sensori misurazione > Misuratori di vibrazioni: Misuratori di vibrazioni fissi; Misuratori di vibrazioni portatili
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Ferramentas e sensores de medição > Medidores de vibração: Medidores de vibração fixos; Medidores de vibração portáteis
en: Hardware > Tools > Measuring Tools & Sensors > Vibration Meters: Fixed Vibration Meters; Handheld Vibration Meters
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 測量工具和感測器 > 振動計: 固定式振動計; 手持式振動計
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 测量工具与传感器 > 振动测量仪: 固定式振动测量仪; 手持式振动测量仪
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > 測定機器・センサー > 振動計: 固定振動計; 手持ち振動計
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Narzędzia pomiarowe i czujniki > Wibrometry: Wibrometry stałe; Wibrometry ręczne
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Mjerni alati i senzori > Mjerači vibracija: Fiksni mjerači vibracija; Ručni mjerači vibracija
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Измерительные инструменты и датчики > Виброметры: Стационарные виброметры; Портативные виброметры
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Sensores y herramientas de medida > Medidores de vibración: Medidores de vibración fijos; Medidores de vibración portátiles
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Sensores e ferramentas para medição > Medidores de vibração: Medidores de vibração fixos; Medidores de vibração portáteis
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > เครื่องมือและเซนเซอร์การวัด > มิเตอร์การสั่น: มิเตอร์การสั่นแบบอยู่กับที่; มิเตอร์การสั่นแบบพกพา
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Måleverktøy og sensorer > Vibrasjonsmålere: Faste vibrasjonsmålere; Håndholdte vibrasjonsmålere
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Måleredskaber og -sensorer > Vibrationsmålere: Faste vibrationsmålere; Håndholdte vibrationsmålere
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Công cụ đo lường & Cảm biến > Máy đo độ rung: Máy đo độ rung cố định; Máy đo độ rung cầm tay
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Messwerkzeuge & Messwertgeber > Schwingungsmesser: Fest installierte Schwingungsmesser; Tragbare Schwingungsmesser
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Mérőeszközök és érzékelők > Rezgésmérők: Rögzített rezgésmérők; Kézi rezgésmérők
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Meethulpmiddelen en sensoren > Vibratiemeters: Vaste vibratiemeters; Draagbare vibratiemeters
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Εργαλεία και αισθητήρες μετρήσεων > Μετρητές κραδασμών: Σταθεροί μετρητές κραδασμών; Φορητοί μετρητές κραδασμών
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 측정 도구/센서 > 진동계: 고정 진동계; 휴대용 진동계
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Instrumente de măsură și senzori > Contoare de vibrații: Contoare de vibrații fixe; Contoare de vibrații portabile
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Mätverktyg och sensorer > Vibrationsmätare: Fasta vibrationsmätare; Handhållna vibrationsmätare